Wisconsin, session 2025, AB103.
do enact as follows:AB103,1Section 1. 118.1255 of the statutes is created to read:118.1255 Pupil name change and pronoun usage; policies. (1) In this section, “official school records” has the meaning given for “pupil records” in s. 118.125 (1) (d).(2) By July 1, 2026, each school board shall adopt a policy related to the conditions under which the school board will do each of the following:(a) Change a pupil’s legal name or a pupil’s legal name and pronouns in official school records.(b) Allow school board employees to regularly use or refer to a pupil who is a minor by a name other than the pupil’s legal name or by pronouns other than the pronouns provided at the time the pupil first enrolls in the school district.(3) A school board shall include at least all of the following in a policy adopted under sub. (2) (a):(a) An initial request to change a pupil’s legal name or pronouns on official school records shall be made to the principal of the school the pupil attends.(b) A pupil’s official school records shall be maintained under a pupil’s legal name and the pronouns provided at the time the pupil first enrolls in the school district, unless the following apply:1. For a minor pupil, the pupil’s parent or guardian submits to the principal a written, notarized statement requesting that the pupil’s name, pronouns, or name and pronouns, be changed in the pupil’s official records and includes in the statement the requested name, pronouns, or name and pronouns.2. For a pupil who is 18 years of age or older, the pupil submits to the principal a written, notarized statement requesting that the pupil’s name, pronouns, or name and pronouns, be changed in the pupil’s official records and includes in the statement the requested name, pronouns, or name and pronouns.(e) A principal or school administrator may not change a pupil’s legal name or pronouns in official school records unless the policy adopted under sub. (2) (a) and any procedures developed to implement the policy have been followed.(f) A procedure under which a parent, legal guardian, or pupil may appeal the denial of a request to change the pupil’s legal name or the pupil’s legal name and pronouns in official school records to the school board. A school board shall treat an appeal under this paragraph in the same manner as a request to correct or delete information in official school records that is inaccurate, misleading, or otherwise in violation of the privacy rights of students under 20 USC 1232g.(4) A school board shall include at least all of the following in a policy adopted under sub. (2) (b):(a) A pupil’s parent or legal guardian determines the names and pronouns school staff may use to refer to the pupil who is a minor during school hours.(b) During school hours, school staff may not refer to a pupil who is a minor by using a name or pronouns that do not align with the pupil’s biological sex without a written, notarized authorization from the pupil’s parent or legal guardian.(c) A written, notarized authorization from a parent or legal guardian is not required under par. (b) to refer to a pupil using a shortened version of the pupil’s legal first or middle name.(5) This section may not be construed to impair the rights of pupils, parents, or guardians under 20 USC 1232g. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab103 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab103 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB103 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB103 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB103: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting